Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.240

Investigative and criminal prosecution activity—Annual report—Security protection.

The attorney general shall annually report to the chief of the Washington state patrol a summary of the attorney general's investigative and criminal prosecution activity conducted pursuant to this chapter. Except to the extent the summary describes information that is a matter of public record, the information made available to the chief of the Washington state patrol shall be given all necessary security protection in accordance with the terms and provisions of applicable laws and rules and shall not be revealed or divulged publicly or privately.

[ 2009 c 560 s 26; 1985 c 251 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—Disposition of property and funds—Assignment/delegation of contractual rights or duties—2009 c 560: See notes following RCW 18.06.080.